Illinois, session 104th, SB3028.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.25d-5, 2-3.64a-5, 2-3.64a-15, 10-17a, 10-19.05, 10-20.9a, 610-29, 13A-11, 13B-25.25, 14A-32, 24A-7, 26A-10, 27A-4, 27A-6, 7and 34-8.14 and by renumbering and changing Section 2-3.206 as 8follows: 9    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.25d-5)10    Sec. 2-3.25d-5. Targeted, Comprehensive, and Intensive 11schools.12    (a) Beginning in 2018, a school designated as 13"Comprehensive" shall be defined as:14        (1) a school that is among the lowest performing 5% of 15    schools in this State based on the multi-measures 16    accountability system defined in the State Plan, with 17    respect to the performance of the "all students" group;18        (2) any high school with a graduation rate of less 19    than 67%;20        (2.5) any school that has completed a full 4-year 21    cycle of Targeted School Improvement but remains 22    identified for Targeted Support for one or more of the 23    same student groups originally identified for Targeted   SB3028- 2 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    Support; or 2        (3) (blank).3    The State Board of Education shall work with districts 4with one or more schools in Comprehensive School Improvement 5Status to perform a needs assessment to determine the 6district's core functions that are areas of strength and 7weakness. The results from the needs assessment shall be used 8by the district and school to identify goals and objectives 9for improvement. The needs assessment shall include, at a 10minimum, a review of the following areas: student performance 11on State assessments; student performance on local 12assessments; finances, including resource allocation reviews; 13governance, including effectiveness of school leadership; 14student engagement opportunities and access to those 15opportunities; instructional practices; standards-aligned 16curriculum; school climate and culture survey results; family 17and community engagement; reflective stakeholder engagement; 18continuous school improvement practices; educator and employee 19quality, including staff continuity and turnover rates; and 20alignment of professional development to continuous 21improvement efforts.22    (b) Beginning in 2018, a school designated as "Targeted" 23shall be defined as a school in which one or more student 24groups is performing at or below the level of the "all 25students" group of schools designated Comprehensive, as 26defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Section.  SB3028- 3 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (c) Beginning in 2023, a school designated as "Intensive" 2shall be defined as a school that has completed a full 4-year 3cycle of Comprehensive School Improvement but does not meet 4the criteria to exit that status, as defined in the State Plan 5referenced in subsection (b) of Section 2-3.25a of this Code, 6at the end of the cycle. 7    (d) All schools in school improvement status, including 8Comprehensive, Targeted, and Intensive schools, must complete 9a school-level needs assessment and develop and implement a 10continuous improvement plan. 11(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.64a-5)13    Sec. 2-3.64a-5. State goals and assessment.14    (a) For the assessment and accountability purposes of this 15Section, "students" includes those students enrolled in a 16public or State-operated elementary school, secondary school, 17or cooperative or joint agreement with a governing body or 18board of control, a charter school operating in compliance 19with the Charter Schools Law, a school operated by a regional 20office of education under Section 13A-3 of this Code, or a 21public school administered by a local public agency or the 22Department of Human Services.23    (b) The State Board of Education shall establish the 24academic standards that are to be applicable to students who 25are subject to State assessments under this Section. The State   SB3028- 4 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Board of Education shall not establish any such standards in 2final form without first providing opportunities for public 3participation and local input in the development of the final 4academic standards. Those opportunities shall include a 5well-publicized period of public comment and opportunities to 6file written comments.7    (c) (Blank). Beginning no later than the 2014-2015 school 8year, the State Board of Education shall annually assess all 9students enrolled in grades 3 through 8 in English language 10arts and mathematics.11    Beginning no later than the 2017-2018 school year, the 12State Board of Education shall annually assess all students in 13science at one grade in grades 3 through 5, at one grade in 14grades 6 through 8, and at one grade in grades 9 through 12.15    The State Board of Education shall annually assess schools 16that operate a secondary education program, as defined in 17Section 22-22 of this Code, in English language arts and 18mathematics. The State Board of Education shall administer no 19more than 3 assessments, per student, of English language arts 20and mathematics for students in a secondary education program. 21One of these assessments shall be recognized by this State's 22public institutions of higher education, as defined in the 23Board of Higher Education Act, for the purpose of student 24application or admissions consideration. The assessment 25administered by the State Board of Education for the purpose 26of student application to or admissions consideration by   SB3028- 5 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1institutions of higher education must be administered on a 2school day during regular student attendance hours, and 3student profile information collected by the assessment shall, 4if available, be made available to the State's public 5institutions of higher education in a timely manner.6    Students who do not take the State's final accountability 7assessment or its approved alternate assessment may not 8receive a regular high school diploma unless the student is 9exempted from taking the State assessments under subsection 10(d) of this Section because the student is enrolled in a 11program of adult and continuing education, as defined in the 12Adult Education Act, or the student is identified by the State 13Board of Education, through rules, as being exempt from the 14assessment.15    The State Board of Education shall not assess students 16under this Section in subjects not required by this Section.17    Districts shall inform their students of the timelines and 18procedures applicable to their participation in every yearly 19administration of the State assessments. The State Board of 20Education shall establish periods of time in each school year 21during which State assessments shall occur to meet the 22objectives of this Section.23    The requirements of this subsection do not apply if the 24State Board of Education has received a waiver from the 25administration of assessments from the U.S. Department of 26Education.  SB3028- 6 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (d) (Blank). Every individualized educational program as 2described in Article 14 shall identify if the State assessment 3or components thereof require accommodation for the student. 4The State Board of Education shall develop rules governing the 5administration of an alternate assessment that may be 6available to students for whom participation in this State's 7regular assessments is not appropriate, even with 8accommodations as allowed under this Section.9    Students receiving special education services whose 10individualized educational programs identify them as eligible 11for the alternative State assessments nevertheless shall have 12the option of also taking this State's regular final 13accountability assessment, which shall be administered in 14accordance with the eligible accommodations appropriate for 15meeting these students' respective needs.16    All students determined to be English learners shall 17participate in the State assessments. The scores of those 18students who have been enrolled in schools in the United 19States for less than 12 months may not be used for the purposes 20of accountability. Any student determined to be an English 21learner shall receive appropriate assessment accommodations, 22including language supports, which shall be established by 23rule. Approved assessment accommodations must be provided 24until the student's English language skills develop to the 25extent that the student is no longer considered to be an 26English learner, as demonstrated through a State-identified   SB3028- 7 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1English language proficiency assessment.2    (e) (Blank). The results or scores of each assessment 3taken under this Section shall be made available to the 4parents of each student.5    In each school year, the scores attained by a student on 6the final accountability assessment must be placed in the 7student's permanent record pursuant to rules that the State 8Board of Education shall adopt for that purpose in accordance 9with Section 3 of the Illinois School Student Records Act. In 10each school year, the scores attained by a student on the State 11assessments administered in grades 3 through 8 must be placed 12in the student's temporary record.13    (f) All schools shall administer the State's academic 14assessment of English language proficiency to all children 15determined to be English learners.16    (g) All schools in this State that are part of the sample 17drawn by the National Center for Education Statistics, in 18collaboration with their school districts and the State Board 19of Education, shall administer the academic assessments under 20the National Assessment of Educational Progress carried out 21under Section 411(b)(2) of the federal National Education 22Statistics Act of 1994 (20 U.S.C. 9010) if the U.S. Secretary 23of Education pays the costs of administering the assessments.24    (h) (Blank).25    (i) (Blank). For the purposes of this subsection (i), 26"academically based assessments" means assessments consisting   SB3028- 8 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1of questions and answers that are measurable and quantifiable 2to measure the knowledge, skills, and ability of students in 3the subject matters covered by the assessments. All 4assessments administered pursuant to this Section must be 5academically based assessments. The scoring of academically 6based assessments shall be reliable, valid, and fair and shall 7meet the guidelines for assessment development and use 8prescribed by the American Psychological Association, the 9National Council on Measurement in Education, and the American 10Educational Research Association.11    The State Board of Education shall review the use of all 12assessment item types in order to ensure that they are valid 13and reliable indicators of student performance aligned to the 14learning standards being assessed and that the development, 15administration, and scoring of these item types are 16justifiable in terms of cost.17    (j) (Blank). The State Superintendent of Education shall 18appoint a committee of no more than 21 members, consisting of 19parents, teachers, school administrators, school board 20members, assessment experts, regional superintendents of 21schools, and citizens, to review the State assessments 22administered by the State Board of Education. The Committee 23shall select one of its members as its chairperson. The 24Committee shall meet on an ongoing basis to review the content 25and design of the assessments (including whether the 26requirements of subsection (i) of this Section have been met),   SB3028- 9 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1the time and money expended at the local and State levels to 2prepare for and administer the assessments, the collective 3results of the assessments as measured against the stated 4purpose of assessing student performance, and other issues 5involving the assessments identified by the Committee. The 6Committee shall make periodic recommendations to the State 7Superintendent of Education and the General Assembly 8concerning the assessments.9    (k) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 10implement this Section.11(Source: P.A. 103-204, eff. 1-1-24; 104-15, eff. 6-30-25.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.64a-15)13    Sec. 2-3.64a-15. Restrictions on prekindergarten through 14grade 12 2 assessments.15    (a) In this Section:16    "Diagnostic and screening purposes" means for the purpose 17of determining if individual students need remedial 18instruction or to determine eligibility for special education, 19early intervention, bilingual education, dyslexia services, 20advanced academic programs as defined in Section 14A-17 of 21this Code, or other related educational services. Any 22assessment used to determine eligibility for special education 23or related services must be consistent with Section 614 of the 24federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. 25"Diagnostic and screening purposes" includes the   SB3028- 10 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1identification and evaluation of students with disabilities. 2"Diagnostic and screening purposes" does not include any 3assessment in which student scores are used to rate or rank a 4classroom, program, teacher, school, school district, or 5jurisdiction.6    "Standardized assessment" means an assessment that 7requires all student test takers to answer the same questions, 8or a selection of questions from a common bank of questions, in 9the same manner or substantially the same questions in the 10same manner. "Standardized assessment" does not include an 11observational assessment tool used to satisfy the requirements 12of Section 2-3.64a-10.13    (b) The State Board of Education may not develop, 14purchase, or require a school district to administer, develop, 15or purchase a standardized assessment for students enrolled or 16preparing to enroll in prekindergarten through grade 12 2, 17other than for diagnostic and screening purposes.18    (c) The State Board of Education may not provide funding 19for any standardized assessment of students enrolled or 20preparing to enroll in prekindergarten through grade 12 2, 21other than for diagnostic and screening purposes.22    (d) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 23the ability of a classroom teacher or school district to 24develop, purchase, administer, or score an assessment for an 25individual classroom, grade level, or group of grade levels in 26any subject area in prekindergarten through the grade 12 2.  SB3028- 11 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (e) Nothing in this Section limits procedures used by a 2school or school district for child find under 34 CFR 3300.111(c) or evaluation under 34 CFR 300.304.4    (f) Nothing in this Section restricts the use of an annual 5assessment of English proficiency of all English learners to 6comply with Section 1111(b)(2)(G) of the federal Elementary 7and Secondary Education Act of 1965.8(Source: P.A. 102-875, eff. 5-13-22; 103-946, eff. 8-9-24.) 9    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.209)10    Sec. 2-3.209 2-3.206. Assessment reporting transparency.11    (a) On or before July 1, 2025 and each fiscal year 12thereafter, the State Board of Education shall report, for 13each assessment contract the State Board of Education enters 14into, all of the following:15        (1) the effective date of the contract and the date 16    the contract concludes;17        (2) whether the contract includes any renewal options 18    and, if so, the length and number of renewals;19        (3) the total contract costs on a yearly basis; and20        (4) the notice of communications with the vendor to 21    exercise renewal options.22    The State Board of Education may not enter into or renew 23any assessment contract that conflicts with Section 2-3.64a-15 24on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 25104th General Assembly.  SB3028- 12 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (b) The State Board of Education shall compile the 2information required under subsection (a) and make that 3information available to the public on its Internet website.4    (c) To further enhance the transparency around 5assessments, the State Board of Education shall engage with 6stakeholder groups, such as the committee appointed under 7Section 2-3.64a-5 and the Balanced Accountability Measure 8Committee created in Section 2-3.25a, other State Board of 9Education established groups, such as the Technical Advisory 10Committee, and any other relevant entities established after 11August 15, 2025 (the effective date of Public Act 104-239) 12this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 13    (d) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 14necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this 15Section. 16(Source: P.A. 104-239, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-10-25.) 17    (105 ILCS 5/10-17a)18    Sec. 10-17a. State, school district, and school report 19cards; Expanded High School Snapshot Report. 20    (1) By October 31, 2013 and October 31 of each subsequent 21school year, the State Board of Education, through the State 22Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a State report 23card, school district report cards, and school report cards, 24and shall by the most economical means provide to each school 25district in this State, including special charter districts   SB3028- 13 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1and districts subject to the provisions of Article 34, the 2report cards for the school district and each of its schools. 3Because of the impacts of the COVID-19 public health emergency 4during school year 2020-2021, the State Board of Education 5shall have until December 31, 2021 to prepare and provide the 6report cards that would otherwise be due by October 31, 2021. 7During a school year in which the Governor has declared a 8disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 97 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, the report 10cards for the school districts and each of its schools shall be 11prepared by December 31.12    (2) In addition to any information required by federal 13law, the State Superintendent shall determine the indicators 14and presentation of the school report card, which must 15include, at a minimum, the most current data collected and 16maintained by the State Board of Education related to the 17following:18        (A) school characteristics and student demographics, 19    including average class size, average teaching experience, 20    student racial/ethnic breakdown, and the percentage of 21    students classified as low-income; the percentage of 22    students classified as English learners, the number of 23    students who graduate from a bilingual or English learner 24    program, and the number of students who graduate from, 25    transfer from, or otherwise leave bilingual programs; the 26    percentage of students who have individualized education   SB3028- 14 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    plans or 504 plans that provide for special education 2    services; the number and the percentage of all students in 3    grades kindergarten through 8, disaggregated by the 4    student demographics described in this paragraph (A), in 5    each of the following categories: (i) those who have been 6    assessed for placement in a gifted education program or 7    accelerated placement, (ii) those who have enrolled in a 8    gifted education program or in accelerated placement, and 9    (iii) for each of categories (i) and (ii), those who 10    received direct instruction from a teacher who holds a 11    gifted education endorsement; the number and the 12    percentage of all students in grades 9 through 12, 13    disaggregated by the student demographics described in 14    this paragraph (A), who have been enrolled in an advanced 15    academic program; the percentage of students scoring at 16    the "exceeds expectations" level on the assessments 17    required under Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code; the 18    percentage of students who annually transferred in or out 19    of the school district; average daily attendance; the 20    per-pupil operating expenditure of the school district; 21    and the per-pupil State average operating expenditure for 22    the district type (elementary, high school, or unit);23        (B) curriculum information, including, where 24    applicable, Advanced Placement, International 25    Baccalaureate or equivalent courses, dual credit courses, 26    foreign language classes, computer science courses, school   SB3028- 15 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    personnel resources (including Career Technical Education 2    teachers), before and after school programs, 3    extracurricular activities, subjects in which elective 4    classes are offered, health and wellness initiatives 5    (including the average number of days of Physical 6    Education per week per student), approved programs of 7    study, awards received, community partnerships, and 8    special programs such as programming for the gifted and 9    talented, students with disabilities, and work-study 10    students;11        (C) student outcomes, including, where applicable, the 12    percentage of students deemed proficient on assessments of 13    State standards, the percentage of students in the eighth 14    grade who pass Algebra, the percentage of students who 15    participated in workplace learning experiences, the 16    percentage of students enrolled in post-secondary 17    institutions (including colleges, universities, community 18    colleges, trade/vocational schools, and training programs 19    leading to career certification within 2 semesters of high 20    school graduation), the percentage of students graduating 21    from high school who are college and career ready, the 22    percentage of graduates enrolled in community colleges, 23    colleges, and universities who are in one or more courses 24    that the community college, college, or university 25    identifies as a developmental course, and the percentage 26    of students with disabilities under the federal   SB3028- 16 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and Article 14 2    of this Code who have fulfilled the minimum State 3    graduation requirements set forth in Section 27-605 of 4    this Code and have been issued a regular high school 5    diploma; 6        (D) student progress, including, where applicable, the 7    percentage of students in the ninth grade who have earned 8    5 credits or more without failing more than one core 9    class, a measure of students entering kindergarten ready 10    to learn, a measure of growth, and the percentage of 11    students who enter high school on track for college and 12    career readiness;13        (E) the school environment, including, where 14    applicable, high school dropout rate by grade level, the 15    percentage of students with less than 10 absences in a 16    school year, the percentage of teachers with less than 10 17    absences in a school year for reasons other than 18    professional development, leaves taken pursuant to the 19    federal Family Medical Leave Act of 1993, long-term 20    disability, or parental leaves, the 3-year average of the 21    percentage of teachers returning to the school from the 22    previous year, the number of different principals at the 23    school in the last 6 years, the number of teachers who hold 24    a gifted education endorsement, the process and criteria 25    used by the district to determine whether a student is 26    eligible for participation in a gifted education program   SB3028- 17 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    or advanced academic program and the manner in which 2    parents and guardians are made aware of the process and 3    criteria, the number of teachers who are National Board 4    Certified Teachers, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, 2 5    or more indicators from any school climate survey selected 6    or approved by the State and administered pursuant to 7    Section 2-3.153 of this Code, with the same or similar 8    indicators included on school report cards for all surveys 9    selected or approved by the State pursuant to Section 10    2-3.153 of this Code, the combined percentage of teachers 11    rated as proficient or excellent in their most recent 12    evaluation, and, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, 13    data on the number of incidents of violence that occurred 14    on school grounds or during school-related activities and 15    that resulted in an out-of-school suspension, expulsion, 16    or removal to an alternative setting, as reported pursuant 17    to Section 2-3.162;18        (F) a school district's and its individual schools' 19    balanced accountability measure, in accordance with 20    Section 2-3.25a of this Code;21        (G) the total and per pupil normal cost amount the 22    State contributed to the Teachers' Retirement System of 23    the State of Illinois in the prior fiscal year for the 24    school's employees, which shall be reported to the State 25    Board of Education by the Teachers' Retirement System of 26    the State of Illinois;  SB3028- 18 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        (H) for a school district organized under Article 34 2    of this Code only, State contributions to the Public 3    School Teachers' Pension and Retirement Fund of Chicago 4    and State contributions for health care for employees of 5    that school district; 6        (I) a school district's Final Percent of Adequacy, as 7    defined in paragraph (4) of subsection (f) of Section 8    18-8.15 of this Code;9        (J) a school district's Local Capacity Target, as 10    defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Section 11    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount;12        (K) a school district's Real Receipts, as defined in 13    paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 18-8.15 of this 14    Code, divided by a school district's Adequacy Target, as 15    defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 16    18-8.15 of this Code, displayed as a percentage amount; 17        (L) a school district's administrative costs;18        (M) whether or not the school has participated in the 19    Illinois Youth Survey. In this paragraph (M), "Illinois 20    Youth Survey" means a self-report survey, administered in 21    school settings every 2 years, designed to gather 22    information about health and social indicators, including 23    substance abuse patterns and the attitudes of students in 24    grades 8, 10, and 12; 25        (N) whether the school offered its students career and 26    technical education opportunities; and   SB3028- 19 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        (O) beginning with the October 2024 report card, the 2    total number of school counselors, school social workers, 3    school nurses, and school psychologists by school, 4    district, and State, the average number of students per 5    school counselor in the school, district, and State, the 6    average number of students per school social worker in the 7    school, district, and State, the average number of 8    students per school nurse in the school, district, and 9    State, and the average number of students per school 10    psychologist in the school, district, and State. 11    The school report card shall also provide information that 12allows for comparing the current outcome, progress, and 13environment data to the State average, to the school data from 14the past 5 years, and to the outcomes, progress, and 15environment of similar schools based on the type of school and 16enrollment of low-income students, special education students, 17and English learners.18    As used in this subsection (2): 19    "Accelerated placement" has the meaning ascribed to that 20term in Section 14A-17 of this Code. 21    "Administrative costs" means costs associated with 22executive, administrative, or managerial functions within the 23school district that involve planning, organizing, managing, 24or directing the school district. 25    "Advanced academic program" means a course of study, 26including, but not limited to, accelerated placement, advanced   SB3028- 20 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1placement coursework, International Baccalaureate coursework, 2dual credit, or any course designated as enriched or honors, 3that a student is enrolled in based on advanced cognitive 4ability or advanced academic achievement compared to local age 5peers and in which the curriculum is substantially 6differentiated from the general curriculum to provide 7appropriate challenge and pace. 8    "Computer science" means the study of computers and 9algorithms, including their principles, their hardware and 10software designs, their implementation, and their impact on 11society. "Computer science" does not include the study of 12everyday uses of computers and computer applications, such as 13keyboarding or accessing the Internet. 14    "Gifted education" means educational services, including 15differentiated curricula and instructional methods, designed 16to meet the needs of gifted children as defined in Article 14A 17of this Code. 18    For the purposes of paragraph (A) of this subsection (2), 19"average daily attendance" means the average of the actual 20number of attendance days during the previous school year for 21any enrolled student who is subject to compulsory attendance 22by Section 26-1 of this Code at each school and charter school. 23    (2.5) For any school report card prepared after July 1, 242025, for all high school graduation completion rates that are 25reported on the school report card as required under this 26Section or by any other State or federal law, the State   SB3028- 21 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Superintendent of Education shall also report the percentage 2of students who did not meet the requirements of high school 3graduation completion for any reason and, of those students, 4the percentage that are classified as students who fulfill the 5requirements of Section 14-16 of this Code.6    The State Superintendent shall ensure that for the 72023-2024 school year there is a specific code for districts 8to report students who fulfill the requirements of Section 914-16 of this Code to ensure accurate reporting under this 10Section.11    All reporting requirements under this subsection (2.5) 12shall be included on the school report card where high school 13graduation completion rates are reported, along with a brief 14explanation of how fulfilling the requirements of Section 1514-16 of this Code is different from receiving a regular high 16school diploma. 17    (3) At the discretion of the State Superintendent, the 18school district report card shall include a subset of the 19information identified in paragraphs (A) through (E) of 20subsection (2) of this Section, as well as information 21relating to the operating expense per pupil and other finances 22of the school district, and the State report card shall 23include a subset of the information identified in paragraphs 24(A) through (E) and paragraph (N) of subsection (2) of this 25Section. The school district report card shall include the 26average daily attendance, as that term is defined in   SB3028- 22 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1subsection (2) of this Section, of students who have 2individualized education programs and students who have 504 3plans that provide for special education services within the 4school district. 5    (4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 6Section, in consultation with key education stakeholders, the 7State Superintendent shall at any time have the discretion to 8amend or update any and all metrics on the school, district, or 9State report card. 10    (5) Annually, no more than 30 calendar days after receipt 11of the school district and school report cards from the State 12Superintendent of Education, each school district, including 13special charter districts and districts subject to the 14provisions of Article 34, shall present such report cards at a 15regular school board meeting subject to applicable notice 16requirements, post the report cards on the school district's 17Internet web site, if the district maintains an Internet web 18site, make the report cards available to a newspaper of 19general circulation serving the district, and, upon request, 20send the report cards home to a parent (unless the district 21does not maintain an Internet web site, in which case the 22report card shall be sent home to parents without request). If 23the district posts the report card on its Internet web site, 24the district shall send a written notice home to parents 25stating (i) that the report card is available on the web site, 26(ii) the address of the web site, (iii) that a printed copy of   SB3028- 23 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1the report card will be sent to parents upon request, and (iv) 2the telephone number that parents may call to request a 3printed copy of the report card.4    (6) Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 5supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in 6lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 7Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 8Public Act 97-8. 9    (7) As used in this subsection (7):10    "Advanced coursework or programs" means any high school 11courses, sequence of courses, or class or grouping of students 12organized to provide more rigorous, enriched, advanced, 13accelerated, gifted, or above grade-level instruction. This 14may include, but is not limited to, Advanced Placement 15courses, International Baccalaureate courses, honors, 16weighted, advanced, or enriched courses, or gifted or 17accelerated programs, classrooms, or courses.18    "Course" means any high school class or course offered by 19a school that is assigned a school course code by the State 20Board of Education. 21    "High school" means a school that maintains any of grades 229 through 12.23    "Standard coursework or programs" means any high school 24courses or classes other than advanced coursework or programs. 25    By December 31, 2027 and by December 31 of each subsequent 26year, the State Board of Education, through the State   SB3028- 24 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a stand-alone 2report covering all public high schools in this State, to be 3referred to as the Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot 4Report. The State Board shall post the Report on the State 5Board's Internet website. Each school district with high 6school enrollment for the reporting year shall include on the 7school district's Internet website, if the district maintains 8an Internet website, a hyperlink to the Report on the State 9Board's Internet website titled "Expanded High School 10Coursework Snapshot Report". Hyperlinks under this subsection 11(7) shall be displayed in a manner that is easily accessible to 12the public.13    The Expanded High School Coursework Snapshot Report shall 14include:15        (A) a listing of all standard coursework or programs 16    that have high school student enrollment;17        (B) a listing of all advanced coursework or programs 18    that have high school student enrollment;19        (C) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 20    high school student enrollment by English learners;21        (D) a listing of all coursework or programs that have 22    high school student enrollment by students with 23    disabilities;24        (E) data tables and graphs comparing advanced 25    coursework or programs enrollment with standard coursework 26    or programs enrollment according to the following   SB3028- 25 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    parameters:2            (i) the average years of experience of all 3        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 4        advanced coursework or programs compared with the 5        average years of experience of all teachers in the 6        high school who are assigned to teach standard 7        coursework or programs;8            (ii) the average years of experience of all 9        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 10        coursework or programs that have high school 11        enrollment by students with disabilities compared with 12        the average years of experience of all teachers in the 13        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 14        or programs that have high school student enrollment 15        by students with disabilities;16            (iii) the average years of experience of all 17        teachers in a high school who are assigned to teach 18        coursework or programs that have high school student 19        enrollment by English learners compared with the 20        average years of experience of all teachers in the 21        high school who are not assigned to teach coursework 22        or programs that have high school student enrollment 23        by English learners;24            (iv) the number of high school teachers who 25        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 26        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach advanced   SB3028- 26 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        coursework or programs compared with the number of 2        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 3        degrees, or higher degrees and who are assigned to 4        teach standard coursework or programs;5            (v) the number of high school teachers who possess 6        bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or higher 7        degrees and who are assigned to teach coursework or 8        programs that have high school student enrollment by 9        students with disabilities compared with the number of 10        teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, master's 11        degrees, or higher degrees and who are not assigned to 12        teach coursework or programs that have high school 13        student enrollment by students with disabilities;14            (vi) the number of high school teachers who 15        possess bachelor's degrees, master's degrees, or 16        higher degrees and who are assigned to teach 17        coursework or programs that have high school student 18        enrollment by English learners compared with the 19        number of teachers who possess bachelor's degrees, 20        master's degrees, or higher degrees and who are not 21        assigned to teach coursework or programs that have 22        high school student enrollment by English learners;23            (vii) the average student enrollment of advanced 24        coursework or programs offered in a high school 25        compared with the average student enrollment of 26        standard coursework or programs;  SB3028- 27 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1            (viii) the percentages of high school students, by 2        race, gender, and program student group, who are 3        enrolled in advanced coursework or programs;4            (ix) (blank);5            (x) (blank);6            (xi) (blank);7            (xii) (blank);8            (xiii) (blank);9            (xiv) the percentage of high school students, by 10        race, gender, and program student group, who earn the 11        equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A through 12        F scale in one or more advanced coursework or programs 13        compared with the percentage of high school students, 14        by race, gender, and program student group, who earn 15        the equivalent of a C grade or higher on a grade A 16        through F scale in one or more standard coursework or 17        programs;18            (xv) (blank);19            (xvi) (blank); and20        (F) data tables and graphs for each race and ethnicity 21    category and gender category describing:22            (i) the total student number and student 23        percentage for Advanced Placement courses taken by 24        race and ethnicity category and gender category;25            (ii) the total student number and student 26        percentage for International Baccalaureate courses   SB3028- 28 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        taken by race and ethnicity category and gender 2        category;3            (iii) (blank);4            (iv) (blank); and5            (v) the total student number and student 6        percentage of high school students who earn a score of 7        3 or higher on the Advanced Placement exam associated 8        with an Advanced Placement course. 9    For data on teacher experience and education under this 10subsection (7), a teacher who teaches a combination of courses 11designated as advanced coursework or programs, courses or 12programs that have high school student enrollment by English 13learners, or standard coursework or programs shall be included 14in all relevant categories and the teacher's level of 15experience shall be added to the categories.16(Source: P.A. 103-116, eff. 6-30-23; 103-263, eff. 6-30-23; 17103-413, eff, 1-1-24; 103-503, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-780, eff. 8-2-24; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 19    (105 ILCS 5/10-19.05)20    Sec. 10-19.05. Daily pupil attendance calculation.21    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, for a 22pupil of legal school age and in kindergarten or any of grades 231 through 12, a day of attendance shall be counted only for 24sessions of not less than 5 clock hours of school work per day 25under direct supervision of (i) teachers or (ii) non-teaching   SB3028- 29 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1personnel or volunteer personnel when engaging in non-teaching 2duties and supervising in those instances specified in 3subsection (a) of Section 10-22.34 and paragraph 10 of Section 434-18. Days of attendance by pupils through verified 5participation in an e-learning program adopted by a school 6board and verified by the regional office of education or 7intermediate service center for the school district under 8Section 10-20.56 of this Code shall be considered as full days 9of attendance under this Section.10    (b) A pupil regularly enrolled in a public school for only 11a part of the school day may be counted on the basis of 12one-sixth of a school day for every class hour of instruction 13of 40 minutes or more attended pursuant to such enrollment, 14unless a pupil is enrolled in a block-schedule format of 80 15minutes or more of instruction, in which case the pupil may be 16counted on the basis of the proportion of minutes of school 17work completed each day to the minimum number of minutes that 18school work is required to be held that day.19    (c) A session of 4 or more clock hours may be counted as a 20day of attendance upon certification by the regional 21superintendent of schools and approval by the State 22Superintendent of Education to the extent that the district 23has been forced to use daily multiple sessions.24    (d) A session of 3 or more clock hours may be counted as a 25day of attendance (1) when the remainder of the school day or 26at least 2 hours in the evening of that day is utilized for an   SB3028- 30 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1in-service training program for teachers, up to a maximum of 210 days per school year, provided that a district conducts an 3in-service training program for teachers in accordance with 4Section 10-22.39 of this Code, or, in lieu of 4 such days, 2 5full days may be used, in which event each such day may be 6counted as a day required for a legal school calendar pursuant 7to Section 10-19 of this Code; (2) when, of the 5 days allowed 8under item (1), a maximum of 4 days are used for parent-teacher 9conferences, or, in lieu of 4 such days, 2 full days are used, 10in which case each such day may be counted as a calendar day 11required under Section 10-19 of this Code, provided that the 12full-day, parent-teacher conference consists of (i) a minimum 13of 5 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences, (ii) both a 14minimum of 2 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences held in 15the evening following a full day of student attendance and a 16minimum of 3 clock hours of parent-teacher conferences held on 17the day immediately following evening parent-teacher 18conferences, or (iii) multiple parent-teacher conferences held 19in the evenings following full days of student attendance in 20which the time used for the parent-teacher conferences is 21equivalent to a minimum of 5 clock hours; and (3) when days in 22addition to those provided in items (1) and (2) are scheduled 23by a school pursuant to its school improvement plan adopted 24under Article 34 or its revised or amended school improvement 25plan adopted under Article 2, provided that (i) such sessions 26of 3 or more clock hours are scheduled to occur at regular   SB3028- 31 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1intervals, (ii) the remainder of the school days in which such 2sessions occur are utilized for in-service training programs 3or other staff development activities for teachers, and (iii) 4a sufficient number of minutes of school work under the direct 5supervision of teachers are added to the school days between 6such regularly scheduled sessions to accumulate not less than 7the number of minutes by which such sessions of 3 or more clock 8hours fall short of 5 clock hours. Days scheduled for 9in-service training programs, staff development activities, or 10parent-teacher conferences may be scheduled separately for 11different grade levels and different attendance centers of the 12district.13    (e) A session of not less than one clock hour of teaching 14hospitalized or homebound pupils on-site or by telephone to 15the classroom may be counted as a half day of attendance; 16however, these pupils must receive 4 or more clock hours of 17instruction to be counted for a full day of attendance.18    (f) A session of at least 4 clock hours may be counted as a 19day of attendance for first grade pupils and pupils in 20full-day kindergartens, and a session of 2 or more hours may be 21counted as a half day of attendance by pupils in kindergartens 22that provide only half days of attendance.23    (g) For children with disabilities who are below the age 24of 6 years and who cannot attend 2 or more clock hours because 25of their disability or immaturity, a session of not less than 26one clock hour may be counted as a half day of attendance;   SB3028- 32 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1however, for such children whose educational needs require a 2session of 4 or more clock hours, a session of at least 4 clock 3hours may be counted as a full day of attendance.4    (h) A recognized kindergarten that provides for only a 5half day of attendance by each pupil shall not have more than 6one half day of attendance counted in any one day. However, 7kindergartens may count 2 and a half days of attendance in any 85 consecutive school days. When a pupil attends such a 9kindergarten for 2 half days on any one school day, the pupil 10shall have the following day as a day absent from school, 11unless the school district obtains permission in writing from 12the State Superintendent of Education. Attendance at 13kindergartens that provide for a full day of attendance by 14each pupil shall be counted the same as attendance by first 15grade pupils. Only the first year of attendance in one 16kindergarten shall be counted, except in the case of children 17who entered the kindergarten in their fifth year whose 18educational development requires a second year of kindergarten 19as determined under rules of the State Board of Education.20    (i) (Blank). On the days when the State's final 21accountability assessment is administered under subsection (c) 22of Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code, the day of attendance for a 23pupil whose school day must be shortened to accommodate 24required testing procedures may be less than 5 clock hours and 25shall be counted toward the 176 days of actual pupil 26attendance required under Section 10-19 of this Code, provided   SB3028- 33 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1that a sufficient number of minutes of school work in excess of 25 clock hours are first completed on other school days to 3compensate for the loss of school work on the examination 4days.5    (j) Pupils enrolled in a remote educational program 6established under Section 10-29 of this Code may be counted on 7the basis of a one-fifth day of attendance for every clock hour 8of instruction attended in the remote educational program, 9provided that, in any month, the school district may not claim 10for a student enrolled in a remote educational program more 11days of attendance than the maximum number of days of 12attendance the district can claim (i) for students enrolled in 13a building holding year-round classes if the student is 14classified as participating in the remote educational program 15on a year-round schedule or (ii) for students enrolled in a 16building not holding year-round classes if the student is not 17classified as participating in the remote educational program 18on a year-round schedule. 19    (j-5) The clock hour requirements of subsections (a) 20through (j) of this Section do not apply if the Governor has 21declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 22to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 23The State Superintendent of Education may establish minimum 24clock hour requirements under Sections 10-30 and 34-18.66 if 25the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 26emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency   SB3028- 34 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Management Agency Act. 2    (k) Pupil participation in any of the following activities 3shall be counted toward the calculation of clock hours of 4school work per day:5        (1) Instruction in a college course in which a student 6    is dually enrolled for both high school credit and college 7    credit.8        (2) Participation in a Supervised Career Development 9    Experience, as defined in Section 10 of the Postsecondary 10    and Workforce Readiness Act, in which student 11    participation and learning outcomes are approved by an 12    educator licensed under Article 21B for assessment of 13    competencies. Participation may include, but is not 14    limited to, scheduled events of local, State, and national 15    youth organizations, career and technical education 16    student organizations, FFA associations, and 4-H programs 17    as part of organized competitions, exhibitions, or 18    conferences.19        (2.5) Participation in any work-based learning 20    experience, including supervised agricultural 21    experiences, in which student participation and learning 22    outcomes are approved by an educator who holds an Educator 23    License with Stipulations with a career and technical 24    educator endorsement and a work-based learning 25    designation, as required by rule. 26        (3) Participation in a youth apprenticeship, as   SB3028- 35 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    jointly defined in rules of the State Board of Education 2    and Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, in 3    which student participation and outcomes are approved by 4    an educator licensed under Article 21B for assessment of 5    competencies.6        (4) Participation in a blended learning program 7    approved by the school district in which course content, 8    student evaluation, and instructional methods are 9    supervised by an educator licensed under Article 21B.10    A student and the student's parent or legal guardian are 11responsible for obtaining coursework that is missed while the 12student participates in an activity pursuant to this 13subsection (k) from the student's teacher.14    School district attendance policies shall be updated, 15added to a district's student handbook, and publicly posted to 16reflect the activities allowed to be counted toward the 17calculation of clock hours of school work under this 18subsection (k) no later than the beginning of the 2026-2027 19school year. These policies shall include, at a minimum, an 20approval process for students to attend allowable activities 21under this subsection (k) and provisions for making up missed 22coursework that do not penalize a student. 23(Source: P.A. 103-560, eff. 1-1-24; 104-250, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.9a)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.9a)25    Sec. 10-20.9a. Final grade; promotion.   SB3028- 36 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (a) Teachers shall administer the approved marking system 2or other approved means of evaluating pupil progress. The 3teacher shall maintain the responsibility and right to 4determine grades and other evaluations of students within the 5grading policies of the district based upon his or her 6professional judgment of available criteria pertinent to any 7given subject area or activity for which he or she is 8responsible. District policy shall provide the procedure and 9reasons by and for which a grade may be changed; provided that 10no grade or evaluation shall be changed without notification 11to the teacher concerning the nature and reasons for such 12change. If such a change is made, the person making the change 13shall assume such responsibility for determining the grade or 14evaluation, and shall initial such change.15    (b) School districts shall not promote students to the 16next higher grade level based upon age or any other social 17reasons not related to the academic performance of the 18students. On or before September 1, 1998, school boards shall 19adopt and enforce a policy on promotion as they deem necessary 20to ensure that students meet local goals and objectives and 21can perform at the expected grade level prior to promotion. 22Decisions to promote or retain students in any classes shall 23be based on successful completion of the curriculum, 24attendance, performance based on the assessments required 25under Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code, the Iowa Test of Basic 26Skills, or other testing, or any other criteria established by   SB3028- 37 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1the school board. Students determined by the local district to 2not qualify for promotion to the next higher grade shall be 3provided remedial assistance, which may include, but shall not 4be limited to, a summer bridge program of no less than 90 5hours, tutorial sessions, increased or concentrated 6instructional time, modifications to instructional materials, 7and retention in grade.8    (c) (Blank).9    (d) (Blank). 10(Source: P.A. 104-391, eff. 8-15-25.) 11    (105 ILCS 5/10-29)12    Sec. 10-29. Remote educational programs.13    (a) For purposes of this Section, "remote educational 14program" means an educational program delivered to students in 15the home or other location outside of a school building that 16meets all of the following criteria:17        (1) A student may participate in the program only 18    after the school district, pursuant to adopted school 19    board policy, and a person authorized to enroll the 20    student under Section 10-20.12b of this Code determine 21    that a remote educational program will best serve the 22    student's individual learning needs. The adopted school 23    board policy shall include, but not be limited to, all of 24    the following:25            (A) Criteria for determining that a remote   SB3028- 38 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        educational program will best serve a student's 2        individual learning needs. The criteria must include 3        consideration of, at a minimum, a student's prior 4        attendance, disciplinary record, and academic history.5            (B) Any limitations on the number of students or 6        grade levels that may participate in a remote 7        educational program.8            (C) A description of the process that the school 9        district will use to approve participation in the 10        remote educational program. The process must include 11        without limitation a requirement that, for any student 12        who qualifies to receive services pursuant to the 13        federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 14        Improvement Act of 2004, the student's participation 15        in a remote educational program receive prior approval 16        from the student's individualized education program 17        team.18            (D) A description of the process the school 19        district will use to develop and approve a written 20        remote educational plan that meets the requirements of 21        subdivision (5) of this subsection (a).22            (E) A description of the system the school 23        district will establish to determine student 24        participation in instruction in accordance with the 25        remote educational program.26            (F) A description of the process for renewing a   SB3028- 39 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        remote educational program at the expiration of its 2        term.3            (G) Such other terms and provisions as the school 4        district deems necessary to provide for the 5        establishment and delivery of a remote educational 6        program.7        (2) The school district has determined that the remote 8    educational program's curriculum is aligned to State 9    learning standards and that the program offers instruction 10    and educational experiences consistent with those given to 11    students at the same grade level in the district.12        (3) The remote educational program is delivered by 13    instructors that meet the following qualifications:14            (A) they are licensed under Article 21B of this 15        Code;16            (B) (blank); and17            (C) they have responsibility for all of the 18        following elements of the program: planning 19        instruction, diagnosing learning needs, prescribing 20        content delivery through class activities, assessing 21        learning, reporting outcomes to administrators and 22        parents and guardians, and evaluating the effects of 23        instruction.24        (4) During the period of time from and including the 25    opening date to the closing date of the regular school 26    term of the school district established pursuant to   SB3028- 40 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    Section 10-19 of this Code, participation in a remote 2    educational program may be claimed for evidence-based 3    funding purposes under Section 18-8.15 of this Code on any 4    calendar day, notwithstanding whether the day is a day of 5    pupil attendance or institute day on the school district's 6    calendar or any other provision of law restricting 7    instruction on that day. If the district holds year-round 8    classes in some buildings, the district shall classify 9    each student's participation in a remote educational 10    program as either on a year-round or a non-year-round 11    schedule for purposes of claiming evidence-based funding. 12    Outside of the regular school term of the district, the 13    remote educational program may be offered as part of any 14    summer school program authorized by this Code.15        (5) Each student participating in a remote educational 16    program must have a written remote educational plan that 17    has been approved by the school district and a person 18    authorized to enroll the student under Section 10-20.12b 19    of this Code. The school district and a person authorized 20    to enroll the student under Section 10-20.12b of this Code 21    must approve any amendment to a remote educational plan. 22    The remote educational plan must include, but is not 23    limited to, all of the following:24            (A) Specific achievement goals for the student 25        aligned to State learning standards.26            (B) A description of all assessments that will be   SB3028- 41 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        used to measure student progress, which description 2        shall indicate the assessments that will be 3        administered at an attendance center within the school 4        district.5            (C) A description of the progress reports that 6        will be provided to the school district and the person 7        or persons authorized to enroll the student under 8        Section 10-20.12b of this Code.9            (D) Expectations, processes, and schedules for 10        interaction between a teacher and student.11            (E) A description of the specific responsibilities 12        of the student's family and the school district with 13        respect to equipment, materials, phone and Internet 14        service, and any other requirements applicable to the 15        home or other location outside of a school building 16        necessary for the delivery of the remote educational 17        program.18            (F) If applicable, a description of how the remote 19        educational program will be delivered in a manner 20        consistent with the student's individualized education 21        program required by Section 614(d) of the federal 22        Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement 23        Act of 2004 or plan to ensure compliance with Section 24        504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.25            (G) A description of the procedures and 26        opportunities for participation in academic and   SB3028- 42 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        extracurricular activities and programs within the 2        school district.3            (H) The identification of a parent, guardian, or 4        other responsible adult who will provide direct 5        supervision of the program. The plan must include an 6        acknowledgment by the parent, guardian, or other 7        responsible adult that he or she may engage only in 8        non-teaching duties not requiring instructional 9        judgment or the evaluation of a student. The plan 10        shall designate the parent, guardian, or other 11        responsible adult as non-teaching personnel or 12        volunteer personnel under subsection (a) of Section 13        10-22.34 of this Code.14            (I) The identification of a school district 15        administrator who will oversee the remote educational 16        program on behalf of the school district and who may be 17        contacted by the student's parents with respect to any 18        issues or concerns with the program.19            (J) The term of the student's participation in the 20        remote educational program, which may not extend for 21        longer than 12 months, unless the term is renewed by 22        the district in accordance with subdivision (7) of 23        this subsection (a).24            (K) A description of the specific location or 25        locations in which the program will be delivered. If 26        the remote educational program is to be delivered to a   SB3028- 43 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        student in any location other than the student's home, 2        the plan must include a written determination by the 3        school district that the location will provide a 4        learning environment appropriate for the delivery of 5        the program. The location or locations in which the 6        program will be delivered shall be deemed a long 7        distance teaching reception area under subsection (a) 8        of Section 10-22.34 of this Code.9            (L) Certification by the school district that the 10        plan meets all other requirements of this Section.11        (6) Students participating in a remote educational 12    program must be enrolled in a school district attendance 13    center pursuant to the school district's enrollment policy 14    or policies. A student participating in a remote 15    educational program must be tested as part of all 16    assessments administered by the school district pursuant 17    to Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code at the attendance center 18    in which the student is enrolled and in accordance with 19    the attendance center's assessment policies and schedule. 20    The student must be included within all accountability 21    determinations for the school district and attendance 22    center under State and federal law.23        (7) The term of a student's participation in a remote 24    educational program may not extend for longer than 12 25    months, unless the term is renewed by the school district. 26    The district may only renew a student's participation in a   SB3028- 44 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    remote educational program following an evaluation of the 2    student's progress in the program, a determination that 3    the student's continuation in the program will best serve 4    the student's individual learning needs, and an amendment 5    to the student's written remote educational plan 6    addressing any changes for the upcoming term of the 7    program. 8    For purposes of this Section, a remote educational program 9does not include instruction delivered to students through an 10e-learning program approved under Section 10-20.56 of this 11Code. 12    (b) A school district may, by resolution of its school 13board, establish a remote educational program.14    (c) (Blank).15    (d) The impact of remote educational programs on wages, 16hours, and terms and conditions of employment of educational 17employees within the school district shall be subject to local 18collective bargaining agreements.19    (e) The use of a home or other location outside of a school 20building for a remote educational program shall not cause the 21home or other location to be deemed a public school facility. 22    (f) A remote educational program may be used, but is not 23required, for instruction delivered to a student in the home 24or other location outside of a school building that is not 25claimed for evidence-based funding purposes under Section 2618-8.15 of this Code.  SB3028- 45 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (g) School districts that, pursuant to this Section, adopt 2a policy for a remote educational program must submit to the 3State Board of Education a copy of the policy and any 4amendments thereto, as well as data on student participation 5in a format specified by the State Board of Education. The 6State Board of Education may perform or contract with an 7outside entity to perform an evaluation of remote educational 8programs in this State.9    (h) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 10necessary to ensure compliance by remote educational programs 11with the requirements of this Section and other applicable 12legal requirements. 13(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/13A-11)15    Sec. 13A-11. Chicago public schools. 16    (a) The Chicago Board of Education may establish 17alternative schools within Chicago and may contract with third 18parties for services otherwise performed by employees, 19including those in a bargaining unit, in accordance with 20Sections 34-8.1, 34-18, and 34-49.21    (b) Alternative schools operated by third parties within 22Chicago shall be exempt from all provisions of this Code, 23except provisions concerning:24        (1) student civil rights;25        (2) staff civil rights;  SB3028- 46 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        (3) health and safety;2        (4) performance and financial audits;3        (5) (blank); the assessments required under Section 4    2-3.64a-5 of this Code;5        (6) Chicago learning outcomes;6        (7) Sections 2-3.25a through 2-3.25j of this Code;7        (8) the Inspector General;8        (9) Section 34-2.4b of this Code; and9        (10) Article 26A and any other provision of this Code 10    concerning students who are parents, expectant parents, or 11    victims of domestic or sexual violence, as defined in 12    Article 26A.13(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/13B-25.25)15    Sec. 13B-25.25. Testing and assessment. A district plan 16for an alternative learning opportunities program operated 17through a cooperative or intergovernmental agreement must 18provide procedures for ensuring that students are included in 19the administration of statewide testing programs. Students 20enrolled in an alternative learning opportunities program 21shall participate in State assessments under Section 2-3.64a-5 22of this Code.23(Source: P.A. 98-972, eff. 8-15-14.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/14A-32)  SB3028- 47 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    Sec. 14A-32. Accelerated placement; school district 2responsibilities.3    (a) Each school district shall have a policy that allows 4for accelerated placement that includes or incorporates by 5reference the following components:6        (1) a provision that provides that participation in 7    accelerated placement is not limited to those children who 8    have been identified as gifted and talented, but rather is 9    open to all children who demonstrate high ability and who 10    may benefit from accelerated placement;11        (2) a fair and equitable decision-making process that 12    involves multiple persons and includes a student's parents 13    or guardians;14        (3) procedures for notifying parents or guardians of a 15    child of a decision affecting that child's participation 16    in an accelerated placement program; and17        (4) an assessment process that includes multiple 18    valid, reliable indicators.19    (a-5) By no later than the beginning of the 2023-2024 20school year, a school district's accelerated placement policy 21shall allow for the automatic enrollment, in the following 22school term, of a student into the next most rigorous level of 23advanced coursework offered by the high school if the student 24exceeds State standards in English language arts, mathematics, 25or science on a State assessment administered under Section 262-3.64a-5 as follows:   SB3028- 48 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1        (1) A student who exceeds State standards in English 2    language arts shall be automatically enrolled into the 3    next most rigorous level of advanced coursework in 4    English, social studies, humanities, or related subjects.5        (2) A student who exceeds State standards in 6    mathematics shall be automatically enrolled into the next 7    most rigorous level of advanced coursework in mathematics.8        (3) A student who exceeds State standards in science 9    shall be automatically enrolled into the next most 10    rigorous level of advanced coursework in science. 11    (a-10) By no later than the beginning of the 2027-2028 12school year, a school district's accelerated placement policy 13shall allow for automatic eligibility, in the following school 14term, for a student to enroll in the next most rigorous level 15of advanced coursework offered by the high school if the 16student meets State standards in English language arts, 17mathematics, or science on a State assessment administered 18under Section 2-3.64a-5 as follows:19        (1) A student who meets State standards in English 20    language arts shall be automatically eligible to enroll in 21    the next most rigorous level of advanced coursework in 22    English, social studies, humanities, or related subjects.23        (2) A student who meets State standards in mathematics 24    shall be automatically eligible to enroll in the next most 25    rigorous level of advanced coursework in mathematics.26        (3) A student who meets State standards in science   SB3028- 49 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    shall be automatically eligible to enroll in the next most 2    rigorous level of advanced coursework in science. 3    (a-15) For a student entering grade 12, the next most 4rigorous level of advanced coursework in English language arts 5or mathematics shall be a dual credit course, as defined in the 6Dual Credit Quality Act, an Advanced Placement course, as 7defined in Section 10 of the College and Career Success for All 8Students Act, or an International Baccalaureate course; 9otherwise, the next most rigorous level of advanced coursework 10under this subsection (a-15) may include a dual credit course, 11as defined in the Dual Credit Quality Act, an Advanced 12Placement course, as defined in Section 10 of the College and 13Career Success for All Students Act, an International 14Baccalaureate course, an honors class, an enrichment 15opportunity, a gifted program, or another program offered by 16the district.17    A school district may use the student's most recent State 18assessment results to determine whether a student meets or 19exceeds State standards. For a student entering grade 9, 20results from the State assessment taken in grades 6 through 8 21may be used. For other high school grades, the results from a 22locally selected, nationally normed assessment may be used 23instead of the State assessment if those results are the most 24recent.25    (a-20) A school district's accelerated placement policy 26may allow for the waiver of a course or unit of instruction   SB3028- 50 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1completion requirement if (i) completion of the course or unit 2of instruction is required by this Code or rules adopted by the 3State Board of Education as a prerequisite to receiving a high 4school diploma and (ii) the school district has determined 5that the student has demonstrated mastery of or competency in 6the content of the course or unit of instruction. The school 7district shall maintain documentation of this determination of 8mastery or competency for each student, that shall include 9identification of the learning standards or competencies 10reviewed, the methods of measurement used, student 11performance, the date of the determination, and identification 12of the district personnel involved in the determination 13process. 14    (a-25) A school district's accelerated placement policy 15must include a process through which the parent or guardian of 16each student who meets State standards is provided 17notification in writing of the student's eligibility for 18enrollment in accelerated courses. This notification must 19provide details on the procedures for the parent or guardian 20to enroll or not enroll the student in accelerated courses, in 21writing, on forms the school district makes available. If no 22course selection is made by the parent or guardian in 23accordance with procedures set forth by the school district, 24the student shall be automatically enrolled in the next most 25rigorous level of coursework. A school district must provide 26the parent or guardian of a student eligible for enrollment   SB3028- 51 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1under subsection (a-5) or (a-10) with the option to instead 2have the student enroll in alternative coursework that better 3aligns with the student's postsecondary education or career 4goals. If applicable, a school district must provide 5notification to a student's parent or guardian that the 6student will receive a waiver of a course or unit of 7instruction completion requirement under subsection (a-5) or 8(a-10). 9    Nothing in subsection (a-5) or (a-10) may be interpreted 10to preclude other students from enrolling in advanced 11coursework per the policy of a school district.12    (a-30) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 13implementation of policies that allow for automatic enrollment 14of students who meet standards on State assessments into the 15next most rigorous level of advanced coursework offered by a 16high school. 17    (b) Further, a school district's accelerated placement 18policy may include or incorporate by reference, but need not 19be limited to, the following components:20        (1) procedures for annually informing the community 21    at-large, including parents or guardians, community-based 22    organizations, and providers of out-of-school programs, 23    about the accelerated placement program and the methods 24    used for the identification of children eligible for 25    accelerated placement, including strategies to reach 26    groups of students and families who have been historically   SB3028- 52 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    underrepresented in accelerated placement programs and 2    advanced coursework;3        (2) a process for referral that allows for multiple 4    referrers, including a child's parents or guardians; other 5    referrers may include licensed education professionals, 6    the child, with the written consent of a parent or 7    guardian, a peer, through a licensed education 8    professional who has knowledge of the referred child's 9    abilities, or, in case of possible early entrance, a 10    preschool educator, pediatrician, or psychologist who 11    knows the child;12        (3) a provision that provides that children 13    participating in an accelerated placement program and 14    their parents or guardians will be provided a written plan 15    detailing the type of acceleration the child will receive 16    and strategies to support the child;17        (4) procedures to provide support and promote success 18    for students who are newly enrolled in an accelerated 19    placement program; 20        (5) a process for the school district to review and 21    utilize disaggregated data on participation in an 22    accelerated placement program to address gaps among 23    demographic groups in accelerated placement opportunities; 24    and 25        (6) procedures to promote equity, which may 26    incorporate one or more of the following evidence-based   SB3028- 53 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    practices:2            (A) the use of multiple tools to assess 3        exceptional potential and provide several pathways 4        into advanced academic programs when assessing student 5        need for advanced academic or accelerated programming;6            (B) providing enrichment opportunities starting in 7        the early grades to address achievement gaps that 8        occur at school entry and provide students with 9        opportunities to demonstrate their advanced potential; 10            (C) the use of universal screening combined with 11        local school-based norms for placement in accelerated 12        and advanced learning programs;13            (D) developing a continuum of services to identify 14        and develop talent in all learners ranging from 15        enriched learning experiences, such as problem-based 16        learning, performance tasks, critical thinking, and 17        career exploration, to accelerated placement and 18        advanced academic programming; and19            (E) providing professional learning in gifted 20        education for teachers and other appropriate school 21        personnel to appropriately identify and challenge 22        students from diverse cultures and backgrounds who may 23        benefit from accelerated placement or advanced 24        academic programming. 25    (c) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules to 26determine data to be collected and disaggregated by   SB3028- 54 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1demographic group regarding accelerated placement, including 2the rates of students who participate in and successfully 3complete advanced coursework, and a method of making the 4information available to the public.5    (d) On or before November 1, 2022, following a review of 6disaggregated data on the participation and successful 7completion rates of students enrolled in an accelerated 8placement program, each school district shall develop a plan 9to expand access to its accelerated placement program and to 10ensure the teaching capacity necessary to meet the increased 11demand.12(Source: P.A. 103-263, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 8-2-24; 13104-261, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/24A-7)  (from Ch. 122, par. 24A-7)15    Sec. 24A-7. Rules. 16    (a) The State Board of Education is authorized to adopt 17such rules as are deemed necessary to implement and accomplish 18the purposes and provisions of this Article, including, but 19not limited to, rules:20        (1) relating to the methods for measuring student 21    growth (including, but not limited to, limitations on the 22    age of usable data and ; the amount of data needed to 23    reliably and validly measure growth for the purpose of 24    teacher and principal evaluations; and whether and at what 25    time annual State assessments may be used as one of   SB3028- 55 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    multiple measures of student growth);2        (2) (blank);3        (3) controlling for such factors as student 4    characteristics (including, but not limited to, students 5    receiving special education and English Learner services), 6    student attendance, and student mobility to best measure 7    the impact that a teacher, principal, school and school 8    district has on students' academic achievement;9        (4) establishing minimum requirements for district 10    teacher and principal evaluation instruments and 11    procedures; and12        (5) (blank). 13    A a school district may use an annual State assessment as a 14measure of student growth for purposes of teacher or principal 15evaluations.16    (b) (Blank). 17    (c) On July 1, 2024, the State Superintendent of Education 18shall convene a Performance Evaluation Advisory Committee for 19the purpose of maintaining and improving the evaluator 20training and pre-qualification program in this State under 21Section 24A-3. The Committee shall be staffed by the State 22Board of Education. Members of the Committee shall include, 23without limitation, representatives from providers of the 24evaluator retraining and pre-qualification program in this 25State, which include teacher unions, school district 26management, including a school district organized under   SB3028- 56 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Article 34, and a statewide organization representing regional 2offices of education. Members of the Committee shall be 3nominated by the providers and appointed by the State 4Superintendent.5    The Committee shall meet initially at the call of the 6State Superintendent and shall select one member as 7chairperson at its initial meeting. The Committee shall meet 8at least quarterly and may also meet at the call of the 9chairperson of the Committee.10    The Committee shall advise the State Board of Education on 11the continued implementation of the evaluator training and 12pre-qualification program in this State, which may include the 13development and delivery of the program's existing and new 14administrators' academies, gathering feedback from program 15instructors and participants, sharing best practices, 16consulting with the State Board on any proposed rule changes 17regarding evaluator training, and other subjects as determined 18by the chairperson of the Committee. 19    (d) Prior to the applicable implementation date, the rules 20shall not apply to teachers assigned to schools identified in 21an agreement entered into between the board of a school 22district operating under Article 34 of this Code and the 23exclusive representative of the district's teachers in 24accordance with Section 34-85c of this Code. 25(Source: P.A. 103-617, eff. 7-1-24; 104-20, eff. 7-1-25.)   SB3028- 57 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (105 ILCS 5/26A-10)2    Sec. 26A-10. Definitions. In this Article:3    "Confidential" means information or facts expected and 4intended to be kept private or protected by an existing 5privilege in the Code of Civil Procedure. Confidential 6information may be disclosed by a school or school district if 7such disclosure is required by State or federal law or is 8necessary to complete proceedings relevant to this Article. 9Designation of student information as confidential applies to 10the school and school district and does not limit a student's 11right to speak about the student's experiences.12    "Consent" includes, at a minimum, a recognition that (i) 13consent is a freely given agreement to sexual activity, (ii) 14an individual's lack of verbal or physical resistance or 15submission resulting from the use of threat of force does not 16constitute consent, (iii) an individual's manner of dress does 17not constitute consent, (iv) an individual's consent to past 18sexual activity does not constitute consent to future sexual 19activity, (v) an individual's consent to engage in one type of 20sexual activity with one person does not constitute consent to 21engage in any other type of sexual activity or sexual activity 22with another person, (vi) an individual can withdraw consent 23at any time, and (vii) an individual cannot consent to sexual 24activity if that individual is unable to understand the nature 25of the activity or give knowing consent due to the 26circumstances that include, but are not limited to, all the   SB3028- 58 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1following: 2        (1) The individual is incapacitated due to the use or 3    influence of alcohol or drugs.4        (2) The individual is asleep or unconscious.5        (3) The individual is under the age of consent.6        (4) The individual is incapacitated due to a mental 7    disability. 8    "Domestic or sexual violence" means domestic violence, 9gender-based harassment, sexual activity without consent, 10sexual assault, sexual violence, or stalking. Domestic or 11sexual violence may occur through electronic communication. 12Domestic or sexual violence exists regardless of when or where 13the violence occurred, whether or not the violence is the 14subject of a criminal investigation or the perpetrator has 15been criminally charged or convicted of a crime, whether or 16not an order of protection or a no-contact order is pending 17before or has been issued by a court, or whether or not any 18domestic or sexual violence took place on school grounds, 19during regular school hours, or during a school-sponsored 20event.21    "Domestic or sexual violence organization" means a 22nonprofit, nongovernmental organization that provides 23assistance to victims of domestic or sexual violence or 24advocates for those victims, including an organization 25carrying out a domestic or sexual violence program, an 26organization operating a shelter or a rape crisis center or   SB3028- 59 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1providing counseling services, an accredited children's 2advocacy center, an organization that provides services to or 3advocates on behalf of children and students who are gay, 4lesbian, bisexual, transgender, or gender nonconforming, an 5organization that provides services to or advocates on behalf 6of children and students who are parents or expectant parents, 7or an organization seeking to eliminate domestic or sexual 8violence or to address the consequences of that violence for 9its victims through legislative advocacy or policy change, 10public education, or service collaboration. 11    "Domestic violence" means abuse, as defined in the 12Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, by family or household 13members, as defined in the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 141986.15    "Electronic communication" includes communications via 16telephone, mobile phone, computer, email, video recorder, fax 17machine, telex, pager, apps or applications, or any other 18electronic communication or cyberstalking under Section 12-7.5 19of the Criminal Code of 2012.20    "Expectant parent" means a student who (i) is pregnant and 21(ii) has not yet received a diploma for completion of a 22secondary education, as defined in Section 22-22.23    "Gender-based harassment" means any harassment or 24discrimination on the basis of an individual's actual or 25perceived sex or gender, including unwelcome sexual advances, 26requests for sexual favors, other verbal or physical conduct   SB3028- 60 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1of a sexual nature, or unwelcome conduct, including verbal, 2nonverbal, or physical conduct that is not sexual in nature 3but is related to a student's status as a parent, expectant 4parent, or victim of domestic or sexual violence.5    "Harassment" means any unwelcome conduct on the basis of a 6student's actual or perceived race, gender, color, religion, 7national origin, ancestry, sex, marital status, order of 8protection status, disability, sexual orientation, gender 9identity, pregnancy, or citizenship status that has the 10purpose or effect of substantially interfering with the 11individual's academic performance or creating an intimidating, 12hostile, or offensive learning environment.13    "Perpetrator" means an individual who commits or is 14alleged to have committed any act of domestic or sexual 15violence. The term "perpetrator" must be used with caution 16when applied to children, particularly young children.17    "Poor academic performance" means a student who has (i) 18scored in the 50th percentile or below on a school 19district-administered standardized test, (ii) not met State 20received a score on a State assessment that does not meet 21standards in one or more of the fundamental learning areas 22under Section 27-1, as applicable for the student's grade 23level, or (iii) not met grade-level expectations on a school 24district-designated assessment.25    "Representative" means an adult who is authorized to act 26on behalf of a student during a proceeding, including an   SB3028- 61 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1attorney, parent, or guardian.2    "School" means a school district or school governed by 3this Code, including a school operating under Article 13, 13A, 413B, 27A, 32, 33, or 34, other than the Department of Juvenile 5Justice School District. "School" includes any other entity 6responsible for administering public schools, such as 7cooperatives, joint agreements, charter schools, special 8charter districts, regional offices of education, local 9agencies, or the Department of Human Services, and nonpublic 10schools recognized by the State Board of Education.11    "Sexual activity" means any knowingly touching or fondling 12by one person, either directly or through clothing, of the sex 13organs, anus, mouth, or breast of another person for the 14purpose of sexual gratification or arousal.15    "Sexual assault" or "sexual violence" means any conduct of 16an adult or minor child proscribed in Article 11 of the 17Criminal Code of 2012, except for Sections 11-35, 11-40, and 1811-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, including conduct 19committed by a perpetrator who is a stranger to the victim and 20conduct by a perpetrator who is known or related by blood or 21marriage to the victim.22    "Stalking" means any conduct proscribed in Section 12-7.3, 2312-7.4, or 12-7.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012, including 24stalking committed by a perpetrator who is a stranger to the 25victim and stalking committed by a perpetrator who is known or 26related by blood or marriage to the victim.  SB3028- 62 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    "Student" or "pupil" means any child who has not yet 2received a diploma for completion of a secondary education. 3"Student" includes, but is not limited to, an unaccompanied 4minor not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.5    "Student at risk of academic failure" means a student who 6is at risk of failing to meet the Illinois Learning Standards 7or failing to graduate from elementary or high school and who 8demonstrates a need for educational support or social services 9beyond those provided by the regular school program.10    "Student parent" means a student who is a custodial or 11noncustodial parent taking an active role in the care and 12supervision of a child and who has not yet received a diploma 13for completion of a secondary education.14    "Support person" means any person whom the victim has 15chosen to include in proceedings for emotional support or 16safety. A support person does not participate in proceedings 17but is permitted to observe and support the victim with parent 18or guardian approval. "Support person" may include, but is not 19limited to, an advocate, clergy, a counselor, and a parent or 20guardian. If a student is age 18 years or older, the student 21has the right to choose a support person without parent or 22guardian approval.23    "Survivor-centered" means a systematic focus on the needs 24and concerns of a survivor of sexual violence, domestic 25violence, dating violence, or stalking that (i) ensures the 26compassionate and sensitive delivery of services in a   SB3028- 63 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1nonjudgmental manner, (ii) ensures an understanding of how 2trauma affects survivor behavior, (iii) maintains survivor 3safety, privacy, and, if possible, confidentiality, and (iv) 4recognizes that a survivor is not responsible for the sexual 5violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking.6    "Trauma-informed response" means a response involving an 7understanding of the complexities of sexual violence, domestic 8violence, dating violence, or stalking through training 9centered on the neurobiological impact of trauma, the 10influence of societal myths and stereotypes surrounding sexual 11violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking, and 12understanding the behavior of perpetrators.13    "Victim" means an individual who has been subjected to one 14or more acts of domestic or sexual violence. 15(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25.) 16    (105 ILCS 5/27A-4)17    Sec. 27A-4. General provisions. 18    (a) The General Assembly does not intend to alter or amend 19the provisions of any court-ordered desegregation plan in 20effect for any school district. A charter school shall be 21subject to all federal and State laws and constitutional 22provisions prohibiting discrimination on the basis of 23disability, race, creed, color, gender, national origin, 24religion, ancestry, marital status, or need for special 25education services.  SB3028- 64 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (b) The total number of charter schools operating under 2this Article at any one time shall not exceed 120. Not more 3than 70 charter schools shall operate at any one time in any 4city having a population exceeding 500,000, with at least 5 5charter schools devoted exclusively to students from 6low-performing or overcrowded schools operating at any one 7time in that city; and not more than 45 charter schools shall 8operate at any one time in the remainder of the State, with not 9more than one charter school that has been initiated by a board 10of education, or by an intergovernmental agreement between or 11among boards of education, operating at any one time in the 12school district where the charter school is located. In 13addition to these charter schools, up to but no more than 5 14charter schools devoted exclusively to re-enrolled high school 15dropouts and/or students 16 or 15 years old at risk of dropping 16out may operate at any one time in any city having a population 17exceeding 500,000. Notwithstanding any provision to the 18contrary in subsection (b) of Section 27A-5 of this Code, each 19such dropout charter may operate up to 15 campuses within the 20city. Any of these dropout charters may have a maximum of 1,875 21enrollment seats, any one of the campuses of the dropout 22charter may have a maximum of 165 enrollment seats, and each 23campus of the dropout charter must be operated, through a 24contract or payroll, by the same legal entity as that for which 25the charter is approved and certified.26    For purposes of implementing this Section, the State Board   SB3028- 65 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1shall assign a number to each charter submission it receives 2under Section 27A-6 for its review and certification, based on 3the chronological order in which the submission is received by 4it. The State Board shall promptly notify local school boards 5when the maximum numbers of certified charter schools 6authorized to operate have been reached.7    (c) No charter shall be granted under this Article that 8would convert any existing private, parochial, or non-public 9school to a charter school.10    (d) Enrollment in a charter school shall be open to any 11pupil who resides within the geographic boundaries of the area 12served by the local school board, provided that the board of 13education in a city having a population exceeding 500,000 may 14designate attendance boundaries for no more than one-third of 15the charter schools permitted in the city if the board of 16education determines that attendance boundaries are needed to 17relieve overcrowding or to better serve low-income and at-risk 18students. Students residing within an attendance boundary may 19be given priority for enrollment, but must not be required to 20attend the charter school.21    (e) Nothing in this Article shall prevent 2 or more local 22school boards from jointly issuing a charter to a single 23shared charter school, provided that all of the provisions of 24this Article are met as to those local school boards.25    (f) No local school board shall require any employee of 26the school district to be employed in a charter school.  SB3028- 66 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    (g) No local school board shall require any pupil residing 2within the geographic boundary of its district to enroll in a 3charter school.4    (h) If there are more eligible applicants for enrollment 5in a charter school than there are spaces available, 6successful applicants shall be selected by lottery. However, 7priority shall be given to siblings of pupils enrolled in the 8charter school and to pupils who were enrolled in the charter 9school the previous school year, unless expelled for cause, 10and priority may be given to pupils residing within the 11charter school's attendance boundary, if a boundary has been 12designated by the board of education in a city having a 13population exceeding 500,000. 14    Any lottery required under this subsection (h) must be 15administered and videotaped by the charter school. The 16authorizer or its designee must be allowed to be present or 17view the lottery in real time. The charter school must 18maintain a videotaped record of the lottery, including a 19time/date stamp. The charter school shall transmit copies of 20the videotape and all records relating to the lottery to the 21authorizer on or before September 1 of each year. 22    Subject to the requirements for priority applicant groups 23set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection (h), any lottery 24required under this subsection (h) must be administered in a 25way that provides each student an equal chance at admission. 26If an authorizer makes a determination that a charter school's   SB3028- 67 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1lottery is in violation of this subsection (h), it may 2administer the lottery directly. After a lottery, each student 3randomly selected for admission to the charter school must be 4notified. Charter schools may not create an admissions process 5subsequent to a lottery that may operate as a barrier to 6registration or enrollment.7    Charter schools may undertake additional intake 8activities, including without limitation student essays, 9school-parent compacts, or open houses, but in no event may a 10charter school require participation in these activities as a 11condition of enrollment. A charter school must submit an 12updated waitlist to the authorizer on a quarterly basis. A 13waitlist must be submitted to the authorizer at the same time 14as quarterly financial statements, if quarterly financial 15statements are required by the authorizer. 16    Dual enrollment at both a charter school and a public 17school or non-public school shall not be allowed. A pupil who 18is suspended or expelled from a charter school shall be deemed 19to be suspended or expelled from the public schools of the 20school district in which the pupil resides. Notwithstanding 21anything to the contrary in this subsection (h): 22        (1) any charter school with a mission exclusive to 23    educating high school dropouts may grant priority 24    admission to students who are high school dropouts and/or 25    students 16 or 15 years old at risk of dropping out and any 26    charter school with a mission exclusive to educating   SB3028- 68 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1    students from low-performing or overcrowded schools may 2    restrict admission to students who are from low-performing 3    or overcrowded schools; "priority admission" for charter 4    schools exclusively devoted to re-enrolled dropouts or 5    students at risk of dropping out means a minimum of 90% of 6    students enrolled shall be high school dropouts; and7        (2) any charter school located in a school district 8    that contains all or part of a federal military base may 9    set aside up to 33% of its current charter enrollment to 10    students with parents assigned to the federal military 11    base, with the remaining 67% subject to the general 12    enrollment and lottery requirements of subsection (d) of 13    this Section and this subsection (h); if a student with a 14    parent assigned to the federal military base withdraws 15    from the charter school during the course of a school year 16    for reasons other than grade promotion, those students 17    with parents assigned to the federal military base shall 18    have preference in filling the vacancy. 19    (i) (Blank).20    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 21contrary, a school district in a city having a population 22exceeding 500,000 shall not have a duty to collectively 23bargain with an exclusive representative of its employees over 24decisions to grant or deny a charter school proposal under 25Section 27A-8 of this Code, decisions to renew or revoke a 26charter under Section 27A-9 of this Code, and the impact of   SB3028- 69 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1these decisions, provided that nothing in this Section shall 2have the effect of negating, abrogating, replacing, reducing, 3diminishing, or limiting in any way employee rights, 4guarantees, or privileges granted in Sections 2, 3, 7, 8, 10, 514, and 15 of the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.6    (k) In this Section:7    "Low-performing school" means a public school in a school 8district organized under Article 34 of this Code that enrolls 9students in any of grades kindergarten through 8 and that is 10ranked within the lowest 10% of schools in that district in 11terms of the percentage of students meeting or exceeding State 12standards on the assessments required under Section 2-3.64a-5 13of this Code.14    "Overcrowded school" means a public school in a school 15district organized under Article 34 of this Code that (i) 16enrolls students in any of grades kindergarten through 8, (ii) 17has a percentage of low-income students of 70% or more, as 18identified in the most recently available School Report Card 19published by the State Board, and (iii) is determined by the 20Chicago Board of Education to be in the most severely 21overcrowded 5% of schools in the district. On or before 22November 1 of each year, the Chicago Board of Education shall 23file a report with the State Board on which schools in the 24district meet the definition of "overcrowded school". 25"Students at risk of dropping out" means students 16 or 15 26years old in a public school in a district organized under   SB3028- 70 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1Article 34 of this Code that enrolls students in any grades 29-12 who have been absent at least 90 school attendance days of 3the previous 180 school attendance days.4    (l) For advertisements created after January 1, 2015, any 5advertisement, including a radio, television, print, Internet, 6social media, or billboard advertisement, purchased by a 7school district or public school, including a charter school, 8with public funds must include a disclaimer stating that the 9advertisement was paid for using public funds.10    This disclaimer requirement does not extend to materials 11created by the charter school, including, but not limited to, 12a school website, informational pamphlets or leaflets, or 13clothing with affixed school logos. 14(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 15    (105 ILCS 5/27A-6)16    Sec. 27A-6. Contract contents; applicability of laws and 17regulations. 18    (a) A certified charter shall constitute a binding 19contract and agreement between the charter school and a local 20school board under the terms of which the local school board 21authorizes the governing body of the charter school to operate 22the charter school on the terms specified in the contract.23    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 24the certified charter may not waive or release the charter 25school from the State goals and , standards, and assessments   SB3028- 71 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1established pursuant to Section 2-3.64a-5 of this Code. The 2certified charter for a charter school operating in a city 3having a population exceeding 500,000 shall require the 4charter school to administer any other nationally recognized 5standardized tests to its students that the chartering entity 6administers to other students, and the results on such tests 7shall be included in the chartering entity's assessment 8reports.9    (c) Subject to the provisions of subsection (e), a 10material revision to a previously certified contract or a 11renewal shall be made with the approval of both the local 12school board and the governing body of the charter school.13    (c-5) The proposed contract shall include a provision on 14how both parties will address minor violations of the 15contract.16    (c-10) After August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public 17Act 103-416), any renewal of a certified charter must include 18a union neutrality clause. 19    (d) The proposed contract between the governing body of a 20proposed charter school and the local school board as 21described in Section 27A-7 must be submitted to and certified 22by the State Board before it can take effect. If the State 23Board recommends that the proposed contract be modified for 24consistency with this Article before it can be certified, the 25modifications must be consented to by both the governing body 26of the charter school and the local school board, and   SB3028- 72 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1resubmitted to the State Board for its certification. If the 2proposed contract is resubmitted in a form that is not 3consistent with this Article, the State Board may refuse to 4certify the charter.5    The State Board shall assign a number to each submission 6or resubmission in chronological order of receipt, and shall 7determine whether the proposed contract is consistent with the 8provisions of this Article. If the proposed contract complies, 9the State Board shall so certify.10    (e) No renewal of a previously certified contract is 11effective unless and until the State Board certifies that the 12renewal is consistent with the provisions of this Article. A 13material revision to a previously certified contract may go 14into effect immediately upon approval of both the local school 15board and the governing body of the charter school, unless 16either party requests in writing that the State Board certify 17that the material revision is consistent with the provisions 18of this Article. If such a request is made, the proposed 19material revision is not effective unless and until the State 20Board so certifies.21(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-416, eff. 8-4-23; 22103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    (105 ILCS 5/34-8.14)24    Sec. 34-8.14. Non-waivable provisions. Notwithstanding 25anything in this Code to the contrary, statutes, regulations,   SB3028- 73 -LRB104 17918 LNS 31354 b1rules, and policy provisions concerning the following shall 2not be waivable:3        (1) student civil rights;4        (2) staff civil rights;5        (3) health and safety;6        (4) performance and financial audits;7        (5) Local School Council provisions, including 8    required statements of economic disclosure;9        (6) the Open Meetings Act;10        (7) the Freedom of Information Act;11        (8) (blank); the assessments required under Section 12    2-3.64a-5 of this Code;13        (9) Chicago learning outcomes;14        (10) Sections 2-3.25a through 2-3.25j of this Code; 15    and16        (11) collective bargaining agreements.17(Source: P.A. 98-972, eff. 8-15-14.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.